Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.84.020

Assessment for and collection of ad valorem taxes.

For the purpose of assessment of all property in all code cities, other than code cities having a population of more than twenty thousand inhabitants, the county assessor of the county wherein such code city is situated shall be the ex officio assessor, and as to the code cities having a population of more than twenty thousand inhabitants such county assessor shall perform the duties as provided in *RCW 36.21.020.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.84.020.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 36.21.020 was repealed by 1994 c 301 s 57.